Hawaii statutes.
§42F-102 Applications for grants.
Requests for grants shall be submitted to the appropriate standing committees
of the legislature at the start of each regular session of the legislature.
Each request shall state:

(1) The name of the requesting organization or
individual;

(2) The public purpose for the grant;

(3) The services to be supported by the grant;

(4) The target group; and

(5) The cost of the grant and the budget. [L 1997, c
190, pt of §3; am L 2014, c 96, §6]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next